Tennessee, session 114, SB0849.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-233, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(c)
(1) In establishing continuing medical educational requirements pursuant
to subsection (b), the board of medical examiners shall develop and offer an
optional course in maternal mental health, which must address the following:
(A) Best practices in screening for maternal mental health
disorders;
(B) The range of maternal mental health disorders;
(C) The range of evidence-based treatment options, including the
importance of allowing a mother to be involved in developing the
treatment plan; and
(D) When an obstetrician or a primary care physician should
consult with a psychiatrist versus making a referral.
(2) The board shall periodically update any curriculum developed
pursuant to this subsection (c) to account for new research.
(3) The board shall accept as credit toward a continuing education
requirement the successful completion of the course described in this subsection
(c) by a physician who practices in the specialty of:
SB0849
002514
- 1 -

(A) Pediatrics;
(B) Obstetrics/gynecology; or
(C) Psychiatry.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-9-107(a), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (a)(2):
(2)
(A) In establishing continuing osteopathic medical educational
requirements pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), the board of osteopathic
examination shall develop and offer an optional course in maternal mental health,
which must address the following:
(i) Best practices in screening for maternal mental health
disorders;
(ii) The range of maternal mental health disorders;
(iii) The range of evidence-based treatment options, including the
importance of allowing a mother to be involved in developing the
treatment plan; and
(iv) When an obstetrician or a primary care osteopathic physician
should consult with a psychiatrist versus making a referral.
(B) The board shall periodically update any curriculum developed
pursuant to this subdivision (a)(2) to account for new research.
(C) The board shall accept as credit toward a continuing education
requirement the successful completion of the course described in this subdivision
(a)(2) by an osteopathic physician who practices in the specialty of:
(i) Pediatrics;
- 2 - 002514

(ii) Obstetrics/gynecology; or
(iii) Psychiatry.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-11-104(h), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (h)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (h)(2):
(2)
(A) In establishing continuing educational requirements pursuant to
subdivision (h)(1), the board shall develop and offer an optional course in
maternal mental health, which must address the following:
(i) Best practices in screening for maternal mental health
disorders;
(ii) The range of maternal mental health disorders; and
(iii) The range of evidence-based treatment options, including the
importance of allowing a mother to be involved in developing the
treatment plan.
(B) The board shall periodically update any curriculum developed
pursuant to this subdivision (h)(2) to account for new research.
(C) The board shall accept as credit toward a continuing education
requirement the successful completion of the course described in this subdivision
(h)(2) by a:
(i) Psychologist designated as a health service provider;
(ii) Psychological examiner;
(iii) Senior psychological examiner; or
(iv) Certified psychological assistant.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002514